Washington, session 2025-2026, HB1832.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:NEW SECTION.Â Â Sec. 1. (1) The legislature finds that a significant number of students in Washington are struggling to meet grade-level standards in core academic areas, with 60 percent of students failing to meet grade-level standards in math and 50 percent failing in English language arts. Specifically in reading, 36 percent of third grade students and 40 percent of fourth grade students are below grade level. On national assessments, 72 percent of Washington eighth graders are not proficient in math. This persistent underperformance poses a critical challenge to the academic success and future opportunities of Washington's students.(2) The legislature further finds that literacy is the foundation upon which all other academic success is built. Learning to read and write is a core element of the state's statutory program of basic education, and these foundational skills are necessary for success in all other subjects. By around the fourth grade, students must transition from "learning to read" to "reading to learn," where they rely on reading skills to access information in subjects like science and social studies. If students do not achieve strong literacy skills by this critical stage, their ability to succeed in these subjects and beyond will be severely compromised.(3) Given these alarming statistics and the importance of early literacy and mathematics skills, the legislature intends to take comprehensive and evidence-based actions to improve student outcomes. The legislature intends to provide additional funding for school districts to target support for students who are not meeting grade-level standards in math and English language arts. The legislature also intends to provide bonuses to educators whose efforts directly lead to improved student performance on assessments, incentivizing excellence in teaching.(4) In an effort to improve early literacy, and set high expectations, the legislature intends to require all students to enter the fourth grade equipped with the reading skills needed to continue their learning. The legislature plans to provide multiple pathways for students to demonstrate proficiency in order to enter fourth grade and intends to allow for good cause exemptions for specific students. However, the legislature believes students must not move to the fourth grade prematurely. This is a critical juncture in a student's education with far-reaching effects on the student's future. Washington public schools have the potential to significantly improve both academic performance and students' lives, similar to states like Mississippi, which, despite having one of the highest populations of low-income students, has achieved remarkable success in reading outcomes.(5) In order to aid schools in meeting this challenge, the legislature intends to provide for the hiring of reading coaches in elementary schools, ensuring students receive expert guidance in building essential literacy skills. Additionally, by the 2027-28 school year, the legislature intends to require public schools to implement a structured literacy program that aligns with the science of reading, an approach that research shows has an effectiveness rate of at least 95 percent. This program incorporates the five pillars of reading: Phonology and phonemic awareness; orthographic knowledge or phonics; reading and writing fluency; vocabulary or oral language knowledge and proficiency; and semantics or comprehension of written language. The legislature intends for these programs to be evidence-based, systemic, sequential, and cumulative, ensuring high quality, explicit, and rigorous instruction that meets the diverse needs of all students. To that end, the legislature also intends to provide further resources for teachers to support students with dyslexia.(6) To improve the quality of reading instruction, the legislature also intends to prohibit ineffective methods that encourage students to guess words. The legislature intends to require the office of the superintendent of public instruction to monitor school district literacy programs to ensure compliance with these new requirements, facilitating continuous improvement across schools.(7) Furthermore, the legislature intends to update teacher endorsement standards for reading and literacy. Teacher preparation programs will be required to include these updated standards. To support teachers in the field, the office of the superintendent of public instruction will regularly update training programs and offer refresher courses focused on evidence-based professional development. This training is intended to address the science of reading and the implementation of effective literacy instruction for students in kindergarten through grade four.(8) Finally, the legislature intends to call for a review of the state's mathematics standards, including a comparison to Singapore math, to assess whether updating the state's standards could improve outcomes for Washington students in this critical subject area.(9) Through these actions, the legislature seeks to ensure that every student in Washington has the foundational skills in literacy and mathematics needed to succeed academically and beyond. These measures align with the state's commitment to providing high quality basic education, addressing the urgent need for intervention and improvement in reading, writing, and mathematics.NEW SECTION.Â Â Sec. 2. A new section is added to chapter 28A.165 RCW to read as follows:(1) Beginning September 1, 2025, according to the schedule established under RCW 28A.510.250, in addition to the amounts provided in RCW 28A.150.260(10), the superintendent of public instruction must allocate up to $250 per eligible student to each school district, increased for inflation from the 2025-26 school year, to establish supplemental supports for students who are not meeting academic standards. The allocation must be calculated as follows:(a) $125 multiplied by the percentage of students that, in the prior school year, did not meet the standard on the statewide student assessment in English language arts as provided for under RCW 28A.655.070, multiplied by the total enrollment of the school district; and(b) $125 multiplied by the percentage of students that, in the prior school year, did not meet the standard on the statewide student assessment in mathematics as provided for under RCW 28A.655.070, multiplied by the total enrollment of the school district.(2) The school district must use the amounts provided under subsection (1) of this section in the same manner as allocations for the learning assistance program, under this chapter.(3) The policy established in this section and funding provided for this policy are not part of the state's statutory program of basic education under RCW 28A.150.200.(4) This section governs school operation and management under RCW 28A.710.040 and 28A.715.020 and applies to charter schools established under chapter 28A.710 RCW and state-tribal education compact schools subject to chapter 28A.715 RCW to the same extent as it applies to school districts.NEW SECTION.Â Â Sec. 3. A new section is added to chapter 28A.405 RCW to read as follows:(1) Beginning September 1, 2026, and by September 1st annually thereafter, the office of the superintendent of public instruction shall allocate $1,000 per enrolled full-time equivalent student to each school district that has met the assessment standard growth threshold.(2)(a) The school district shall use the amounts provided under subsection (1) of this section to distribute bonuses to school staff who, as determined by the district, have directly contributed to increasing the district's assessment standard growth. When calculating the amount of the bonuses and selecting the staff to receive the bonuses, the school district must consider which certificated and classified staff directly contributed to supporting students in meeting the standards on the state math assessment and the state English language arts assessment. This consideration may include teachers who work outside the assessed courses and grade levels.(b) The bonus amounts determined by the school district under (a) of this subsection (2) must not exceed $12,000 per full-time equivalent staff.(c) School districts are prohibited from engaging in collective bargaining on the distribution of the bonuses under (a) of this subsection (2).(d) The school district board of directors is encouraged to establish an advisory committee that includes certificated instructional staff and classified staff to develop recommendations for the distribution of bonuses to school staff who have directly contributed to increasing the district's assessment standard growth.(e) The bonuses provided under this section are in addition to compensation received under the annual salary schedules adopted in accordance with RCW 28A.405.200.(3) The policy established in this section and funding provided for this policy are not part of the state's statutory program of basic education under RCW 28A.150.200.(4) This section governs school operation and management under RCW 28A.710.040 and 28A.715.020 and applies to charter schools established under chapter 28A.710 RCW and state-tribal education compact schools subject to chapter 28A.715 RCW to the same extent as it applies to school districts.(5) For purposes of this section, the following definitions apply:(a) "Assessment standard growth threshold" means:(i) For the 2025-26 and 2026-27 school years, a three percent year-over-year growth in either the state math assessment or the state English language arts assessment;(ii) For the 2027-28 and 2028-29 school years, an eight percent year-over-year growth in either the state math assessment or the state English language arts assessment; and(iii) Beginning in the 2029-30 school year, 80 percent of students met the standard on the state math assessment or the state English language arts assessment.(b) "State English language arts assessment" means the statewide student assessment in English language arts as provided for under RCW 28A.655.070.(c) "State math assessment" means the statewide student assessment in mathematics as provided for under RCW 28A.655.070.NEW SECTION.Â Â Sec. 4. A new section is added to chapter 28A.630 RCW to read as follows:(1) Subject to the availability of amounts appropriated for this specific purpose, the reading to ensure academic development grant program, known as the READ grant program, is established to improve early elementary student literacy.(2) Beginning September 1, 2025, the office of the superintendent of public instruction must award up to 125 READ grants. Grants may not exceed $75,000 per year for four years, per public elementary school. Grants may be awarded to one or more elementary schools within an applying school district.(3)(a) In making grant allocations, the office of the superintendent of public instruction must give priority to public elementary schools with the highest percentages of tested students receiving a score of basic or below basic, as defined in RCW 28A.655.230, on the third grade statewide student assessment in English language arts as provided for under RCW 28A.655.070, in the previous school year. The office may also consider the percentage of students qualifying for free or reduced-price meals and the percentage of students participating in English learner programs.(b) For the purposes of this subsection, the office of the superintendent of public instruction must exclude the following from the calculation of a school's percentage of tested students:(i) Students enrolled in the transitional bilingual instruction program under chapter 28A.180 RCW unless the student has participated in the program for three school years; and(ii) Students with disabilities whose individualized education program specifies a different standard to measure reading performance than is required for the statewide student assessment in English language arts.(4) Grant funds awarded under this section must be used to hire reading coaches in the awarded public elementary school. As used in this section, a reading coach is a classified staff person, with at least two years of experience teaching literacy skills to students, who provides additional educational support services to elementary students to improve their reading skills.(5)(a) The office of the superintendent of public instruction must evaluate the READ grant program, in collaboration with recipients of the grants in this section, and prepare a report on the outcomes of the program. The report must include a comparison between the third grade statewide student English language arts assessment scores, both proficiency and growth rates, of the awarded elementary schools and the scores of comparable schools. A preliminary report is due November 30, 2028, and a final report is due November 30, 2029.(b) The report required by (a) of this subsection must be submitted to the appropriate committees of the legislature, in accordance with RCW 43.01.036.(6) As used in this section, "public school" has the same meaning as provided in RCW 28A.150.010.(7) This section expires July 1, 2030.Sec. 5. RCW 28A.165.100 and 2021 c 111 s 8 are each amended to read as follows:(1) School districts shall record in the statewide individual student data system annual entrance and exit performance data for each student participating in the learning assistance program according to specifications established by the office of the superintendent of public instruction.(2) Annually (([by]))by September 30th, school districts shall report to the office of the superintendent of public instruction, using a common format prepared by the office:(a) The amount of academic growth gained by students participating in the learning assistance program;(b) The number of students who gain at least one year of academic growth;(c) The specific practices, activities, and programs used by each school building that received learning assistance program funding;(d) The percentage of learning assistance program funding used to engage community partners, the number of students receiving direct supports and services from those community partners, and the types of supports and services; ((and))(e) The amount of funding for students not meeting academic standards that each school district received under section 2(1) of this act;(f) The number of public schools and the number of certificated instructional staff that received assessment standard growth bonus funding under section 3 of this act; and(g) Other data if required by the office of the superintendent of public instruction to demonstrate the efficacy of the learning assistance program expenditures to show student academic growth gains including indicators aligned with the accountability framework for schools receiving support under RCW 28A.657.110.(3) By January 1, 2020, and each January 1st thereafter, the office of the superintendent of public instruction shall compile the school district data reported as required by subsection (2) of this section, and report, in compliance with RCW 43.01.036, to the appropriate committees of the legislature with the annual and longitudinal gains for the specific practices, activities, and programs used by the school districts and schools to show which are the most effective. The data must be disaggregated by student subgroups as described in RCW 28A.300.042(1) for student-level data.Sec. 6. RCW 28A.400.200 and 2018 c 266 s 205 are each amended to read as follows:(1) Every school district board of directors shall fix, alter, allow, and order paid salaries and compensation for all district employees in conformance with this section.(2)(a) Through the 2017-18 school year, salaries for certificated instructional staff shall not be less than the salary provided in the appropriations act in the statewide salary allocation schedule for an employee with a baccalaureate degree and zero years of service;(b) Salaries for certificated instructional staff with a master's degree shall not be less than the salary provided in the appropriations act in the statewide salary allocation schedule for an employee with a master's degree and zero years of service; and(c) Beginning with the 2018-19 school year:(i) Salaries for full-time certificated instructional staff must not be less than forty thousand dollars, to be adjusted for regional differences in the cost of hiring staff as specified in RCW 28A.150.410, and to be adjusted annually by the same inflationary measure as provided in RCW 28A.400.205;(ii) Salaries for full-time certificated instructional staff with at least five years of experience must exceed by at least ten percent the value specified in (c)(i) of this subsection;(iii) A district may not pay full-time certificated instructional staff a salary that exceeds ninety thousand dollars, subject to adjustment for regional differences in the cost of hiring staff as specified in RCW 28A.150.410. This maximum salary is adjusted annually by the inflationary measure in RCW 28A.400.205;(iv) These minimum and maximum salaries apply to the services provided as part of the state's statutory program of basic education and exclude supplemental contracts for additional time, responsibility, or incentive pursuant to this section or for enrichment pursuant to RCW 28A.150.276;(v) These minimum and maximum salaries also exclude the assessment standard growth bonuses provided under section 3 of this act;(vi) A district may pay a salary that exceeds this maximum salary by up to ten percent for full-time certificated instructional staff: Who are educational staff associates; who teach in the subjects of science, technology, engineering, or math; or who teach in the transitional bilingual instruction or special education programs.(3)(a)(i) Through the 2017-18 school year the actual average salary paid to certificated instructional staff shall not exceed the district's average certificated instructional staff salary used for the state basic education allocations for that school year as determined pursuant to RCW 28A.150.410.(ii) ((For the 2018-19 school year, salaries for certificated instructional staff are subject to the limitations in RCW 41.59.800.(iii))) Beginning with the 2019-20 school year, for purposes of subsection (4) of this section, RCW 28A.150.276, and 28A.505.100, each school district must annually identify the actual salary paid to each certificated instructional staff for services rendered as part of the state's program of basic education.(b) Through the 2018-19 school year, fringe benefit contributions for certificated instructional staff shall be included as salary under (a)(i) of this subsection only to the extent that the district's actual average benefit contribution exceeds the amount of the insurance benefits allocation, less the amount remitted by districts to the health care authority for retiree subsidies, provided per certificated instructional staff unit in the state operating appropriations act in effect at the time the compensation is payable. For purposes of this section, fringe benefits shall not include payment for unused leave for illness or injury under RCW 28A.400.210; employer contributions for old age survivors insurance, workers' compensation, unemployment compensation, and retirement benefits under the Washington state retirement system; or employer contributions for health benefits in excess of the insurance benefits allocation provided per certificated instructional staff unit in the state operating appropriations act in effect at the time the compensation is payable. A school district may not use state funds to provide employer contributions for such excess health benefits.(c) Salary and benefits for certificated instructional staff in programs other than basic education shall be consistent with the salary and benefits paid to certificated instructional staff in the basic education program.(4)(a) Salaries and benefits for certificated instructional staff may exceed the limitations in subsection (3) of this section only by separate contract for additional time, for additional responsibilities, or for incentives. Supplemental contracts shall not cause the state to incur any present or future funding obligation. Supplemental contracts must be accounted for by a school district when the district is developing its four-year budget plan under RCW 28A.505.040.(b) Supplemental contracts shall be subject to the collective bargaining provisions of chapter 41.59 RCW and the provisions of RCW 28A.405.240, shall not exceed one year, and if not renewed shall not constitute adverse change in accordance with RCW 28A.405.300 through 28A.405.380. No district may enter into a supplemental contract under this subsection for the provision of services which are a part of the basic education program required by Article IX, section 1 of the state Constitution and RCW 28A.150.220.(c)(i) Beginning September 1, 2019, supplemental contracts for certificated instructional staff are subject to the following additional restrictions: School districts may enter into supplemental contracts only for enrichment activities as defined in and subject to the limitations of RCW 28A.150.276.(ii) For a supplemental contract, or portion of a supplemental contract, that is time-based, the hourly rate the district pays may not exceed the hourly rate provided to that same instructional staff for services under the basic education salary identified under subsection (3)(a)(((iii)))(ii) of this section. For a supplemental contract, or portion of a supplemental contract that is not time-based, the contract must document the additional duties, responsibilities, or incentives that are being funded in the contract.(5) Employee benefit plans offered by any district shall comply with RCW 28A.400.350, 28A.400.275, and 28A.400.280.NEW SECTION.Â Â Sec. 7. RCW 28A.405.415 (BonusesâNational board for professional standards certification) and 2023 c 379 s 7, 2020 c 288 s 5, 2013 2nd sp.s. c 5 s 4, 2011 1st sp.s. c 18 s 4, 2009 c 539 s 6, 2008 c 175 s 2, & 2007 c 398 s 2 are each repealed, effective September 1, 2025.NEW SECTION.Â Â Sec. 8. A new section is added to chapter 28A.300 RCW to read as follows:The office of the superintendent of public instruction shall publish longitudinal data on its website regarding public school and school district performance across various student measures. The most recent 10 years of student measures data must be published for the following student measures, at a minimum: Assessment proficiency, graduation rates, assessment growth, enrollment, and discipline. If student measures data is unavailable or lacks sufficient quality for publication, the office must provide an explanation on the relevant webpage.Sec. 9. RCW 28A.320.202 and 2013 2nd sp.s. c 18 s 102 are each amended to read as follows:(1) School districts ((are responsible for providing a comprehensive system of instruction and services in reading and early literacy to kindergarten through fourth grade students that is based on the degree of student need for additional support. Reading and early literacy systems provided by school districts must include:(1) Annual use of))shall implement a structured literacy program that uses evidence-based instructional practices to promote the early literacy and reading and writing literacy of students in kindergarten through fourth grade. School districts are encouraged to phase in use of the program elements beginning with the 2025-26 school year and shall fully implement all program elements by the beginning of the 2027-28 school year.(2) A structured literacy program required by subsection (1) of this section must:(a) Include at least the following essential components: Semantics or comprehending written language; reading and writing fluency; orthographic knowledge or phonics; phonology and phonemic awareness; and vocabulary or oral language knowledge and proficiency;(b) Be systemic, sequential, and cumulative;(c) Provide direct, explicit, and rigorous instruction that is high quality and knowledge rich;(d) Be diagnostic of and responsive to individual student needs, including by being multisensory and multimodal;(e) Provide instruction and services, including literacy interventions under RCW 28A.320.260 within a multitiered system of supports;(f) Use screening assessments and other tools to identify at-risk readers in kindergarten through fourth grade, such as the Washington kindergarten inventory of developing skills, the Washington state early learning and development guidelines for birth through third grade, literacy screenings for students in kindergarten through second grade under RCW 28A.320.260, the second grade reading assessment under RCW 28A.300.310, and locally used assessments and other tools;(g) For students in third grade who are reading below grade level, implement intensive reading improvement strategies under RCW 28A.655.230 and 28A.655.235; and(((2) Research-based))(h) Use research-based family involvement and engagement strategies, including strategies to help families and guardians assist in improving students' reading and early literacy skills at home.(3) A structured literacy program is encouraged to offer the parents of a student who performs below grade level on a second grade reading assessment selected under RCW 28A.300.310, a reading improvement strategy that includes small group reading instruction, a summer program, or other options developed to meet the needs of students to prepare for third grade.(4) The three-cueing system model of reading instruction, which relies on meaning, structure and syntax, and visual cues (commonly referred to as MSV), is prohibited in the structured literacy program required by subsection (1) of this section.NEW SECTION.Â Â Sec. 10. A new section is added to chapter 28A.410 RCW to read as follows:(1) Within existing resources and by September 1, 2026, the Washington professional educator standards board shall adopt revised standards for teacher endorsements with reading and writing literacy competencies. The revised standards must include those competencies necessary to participate in the delivery of a structured literacy program under RCW 28A.320.202 (as recodified by this act), which, among other requirements, includes the essential components of phonemic awareness, phonics, fluency, vocabulary, and comprehension.(2) The Washington professional educator standards board shall require approved educator preparation programs offering teacher endorsements with reading and writing literacy competencies to incorporate the revised standards into their programs by the beginning of the 2027-28 academic year.(3) For the purposes of this section "teacher endorsements with reading and writing literacy competencies" includes early childhood education, early childhood special education, elementary education, reading, special education, and other endorsements related to reading and writing literacy as determined by the Washington professional educator standards board.NEW SECTION.Â Â Sec. 11. A new section is added to chapter 28A.410 RCW to read as follows:(1) To renew a teacher certificate on or after September 1, 2028, a teacher holding an endorsement in, or with an assignment related to, reading and literacy competencies must complete training on the skills and knowledge necessary to participate in the delivery of a structured literacy program under RCW 28A.320.202 (as recodified by this act). To meet the requirements of this section, the relevant teachers must first complete the educator training program described in RCW 28A.300.530 or an equivalent training program approved by the Washington professional educator standards board, and may subsequently either retake the full educator training program or the refresher course described in RCW 28A.300.530.(2) The Washington professional educator standards board shall determine the endorsements and assignments to which the provisions of this section apply, after considering the definition of "teacher endorsements with reading and writing literacy competencies" in section 10 of this act.NEW SECTION.Â Â Sec. 12. A new section is added to chapter 28A.710 RCW to read as follows:RCW 28A.320.202 (as recodified by this act) governs school operation and management under RCW 28A.710.040 and applies to charter schools established under this chapter.NEW SECTION.Â Â Sec. 13. A new section is added to chapter 28A.715 RCW to read as follows:RCW 28A.320.202 (as recodified by this act) governs school operation and management under RCW 28A.715.020 and applies to state-tribal education compact schools subject to this chapter.Sec. 14. RCW 28A.300.530 and 2009 c 546 s 2 are each amended to read as follows:(1) Within available resources, the office of the superintendent of public instruction, in consultation with ((the school districts that participated in the Lorraine Wojahn dyslexia pilot program, and with an international))appropriate experts, for example, the educational service districts and international and state-level nonprofit organizations dedicated to supporting efforts to provide appropriate identification of and instruction for individuals with dyslexia, shall((:(a) Develop))develop, and periodically update, an educator training program and a refresher course to enhance the reading, writing, and spelling skills of ((students with dyslexia. The training program must provide research-based, multisensory literacy intervention professional development in the areas of dyslexia and intervention implementation. The program shall))kindergarten through fourth grade students, including students who display indications of, or areas of weakness associated with, dyslexia. The educator training program and refresher course must provide evidence-based professional development on the skills and knowledge necessary to participate in the delivery of a structured literacy program under RCW 28A.320.202 (as recodified by this act).(2) The educator training program and refresher course must be posted on the website of the office of the superintendent of public instruction.(3) The educator training program and refresher course may be regionally delivered through the educational service districts. The educational service districts may seek assistance from ((the international)) nonprofit organizations to deliver the educator training((; and(b) Develop a dyslexia handbook to be used as a reference for teachers and parents of students with dyslexia. The handbook shall be modeled after other state dyslexia handbooks, and shall include guidelines for school districts to follow as they identify and provide services for students with dyslexia. Additionally, the handbook shall provide school districts, and parents and guardians with information regarding the state's relevant statutes and their relation to federal special education laws. The handbook shall be posted on the website of the office of the superintendent of public instruction.(2) Beginning September 1, 2009, and annually thereafter, each))program and refresher course.(4) Each educational service district shall annually report to the office of the superintendent of public instruction the number of individuals who participate in the educator training ((developed and offered by the educational service district))program and refresher course. The Washington professional educator standards board shall annually report to the office of the superintendent of public instruction the number of teachers holding an endorsement in, or with an assignment related to, reading and writing literacy competencies who have not completed the educator training program. The office of the superintendent of public instruction shall report that information to the legislative education committees by December 1st annually and in compliance with RCW 43.01.036.(5) "Teachers holding an endorsement in, or with an assignment related to, reading and writing literacy competencies" has the same meaning as "teacher endorsements with reading and writing literacy competencies" in section 10 of this act.Sec. 15. RCW 28A.300.570 and 2018 c 58 s 29 are each amended to read as follows:In support of reading and early literacy, including structured literacy programs under RCW 28A.320.202 (as recodified by this act), the office of the superintendent of public instruction is responsible for:(1) Continuing to work collaboratively with state and regional partners such as the department of children, youth, and families and the educational service districts to establish early literacy benchmarks and standards and to implement the Washington state ((comprehensive))structured literacy plan;(2) ((Disseminating))Within existing resources, disseminating research and information ((to school districts)) about evidence-based programs and practices in reading readiness skills, early literacy, and reading instruction to school districts, as well as local government and community-based organizations that support families with children;(3) Providing statewide models to support ((school districts that are implementing response to intervention initiatives, positive behavior intervention support systems, or other similar comprehensive models of data-based identification and early intervention))public schools to implement multitiered system of supports; ((and))(4) Within available funds and in partnership with the educational service districts, providing technical assistance ((and professional development opportunities for school districts))to public schools delivering a structured literacy program under RCW 28A.320.202 (as recodified by this act);(5) Developing, and periodically updating, a dyslexia handbook to be used as a reference for teachers and parents of students who display indications of, or areas of weakness associated with, dyslexia. The handbook must include guidelines for school districts to follow as they identify and provide services for students with dyslexia. Additionally, the handbook must provide school districts and parents with information regarding the state's relevant statutes and their relation to federal special education laws, as well as parental support resources. The handbook must be posted on the website of the office of the superintendent of public instruction; and(6) Within existing resources, reviewing and monitoring structured literacy programs to ensure compliance with the requirements of RCW 28A.320.202 (as recodified by this act), including any curricula used to implement the structured literacy program, RCW 28A.320.260, 28A.655.230, and 28A.655.235, and sections 12 and 13 of this act. The reviews and monitoring required by this subsection may be conducted concurrently with other oversight and monitoring conducted by the office of the superintendent of public instruction.Sec. 16. RCW 28A.150.220 and 2024 c 66 s 10 are each amended to read as follows:(1) In order for students to have the opportunity to develop the basic education knowledge and skills under RCW 28A.150.210, school districts must provide instruction of sufficient quantity and quality and give students the opportunity to complete graduation requirements that are intended to prepare them for postsecondary education, gainful employment, and citizenship. The program established under this section shall be the minimum instructional program of basic education offered by school districts.(2) Each school district shall make available to students the following minimum instructional offering each school year:(a) For students enrolled in grades one through 12, at least a district-wide annual average of 1,000 hours, which shall be increased beginning in the 2015-16 school year to at least 1,080 instructional hours for students enrolled in grades nine through 12 and at least 1,000 instructional hours for students in grades one through eight, all of which may be calculated by a school district using a district-wide annual average of instructional hours over grades one through 12; and(b) For students enrolled in kindergarten, at least 450 instructional hours, which shall be increased to at least 1,000 instructional hours according to the implementation schedule under RCW 28A.150.315.(3) The instructional program of basic education provided by each school district shall include:(a) Instruction in the state learning standards under RCW 28A.655.070;(b) Instruction that provides students the opportunity to complete 24 credits for high school graduation. Course distribution requirements may be established by the state board of education under RCW 28A.230.090;(c) If the state learning standards include a requirement of languages other than English, the requirement may be met by students receiving instruction in one or more American Indian languages;(d) Supplemental instruction and services for students who are not meeting academic standards through the learning assistance program under RCW 28A.165.005 through 28A.165.065;(e) Supplemental instruction and services for eligible and enrolled students and exited students whose primary language is other than English through the transitional bilingual instruction program under RCW 28A.180.010 through 28A.180.080;(f) The opportunity for an appropriate education at public expense as defined by RCW 28A.155.020 for all eligible students with disabilities as defined in RCW 28A.155.020; and(g) Programs for highly capable students under RCW 28A.185.010 through 28A.185.030.(4) Nothing contained in this section shall be construed to require individual students to attend school for any particular number of hours per day or to take any particular courses.(5)(a) Each school district's kindergarten through 12th grade basic educational program shall be accessible to all students who are five years of age, as provided by RCW 28A.225.160, and less than 21 years of age and shall consist of a minimum of 180 school days per school year in such grades as are conducted by a school district, and 180 half-days of instruction, or equivalent, in kindergarten, to be increased to a minimum of 180 school days per school year according to the implementation schedule under RCW 28A.150.315.(b) Schools administering the Washington kindergarten inventory of developing skills may use up to three school days at the beginning of the school year to meet with parents and families as required in the parent involvement component of the inventory.(c) In the case of students who are graduating from high school, a school district may schedule the last five school days of the 180-day school year for noninstructional purposes including, but not limited to, the observance of graduation and early release from school upon the request of a student. All such students may be claimed as a full-time equivalent student to the extent they could otherwise have been so claimed for the purposes of RCW 28A.150.250 and 28A.150.260. Any hours scheduled by a school district for noninstructional purposes during the last five school days for such students shall count toward the instructional hours requirement in subsection (2)(a) of this section.(6) Subject to RCW 28A.150.276, nothing in this section precludes a school district from enriching the instructional program of basic education, such as offering additional instruction or providing additional services, programs, or activities that the school district determines to be appropriate for the education of the school district's students.(7) The state board of education shall adopt rules to implement and ensure compliance with the program requirements imposed by this section, RCW 28A.150.250 ((and)), 28A.150.260, and 28A.320.202 (as recodified by this act), and such related supplemental program approval requirements as the state board may establish.Sec. 17. RCW 28A.300.720 and 2018 c 75 s 5 are each amended to read as follows:(1) By June 1, 2021, the superintendent of public instruction must review the dyslexia advisory council's recommendations required under ((RCW 28A.300.710))section 4, chapter 75, Laws of 2018 and make available to school districts:(a) Best practices for school district implementation of screenings as required under RCW 28A.320.260, including trainings for school district staff conducting the screenings, for example, the educator training program and refresher course delivered under RCW 28A.300.530;(b) Best practices for using a multitiered system((s)) of supports to provide interventions as required under RCW 28A.320.260, including trainings for school district staff in instructional methods specifically targeting students' areas of weakness;(c) Sample educational information for parents and families related to dyslexia that includes a list of resources for parental support, such as the dyslexia handbook developed under RCW 28A.300.570; and(d) Best practices to address the needs of students above grade two who show indications of, or areas of weakness associated with, dyslexia.(2) By February 15, 2022, the superintendent of public instruction must review the dyslexia advisory council's updated report required under ((RCW 28A.300.710))section 4, chapter 75, Laws of 2018 and revise the best practices and sample educational information made available to school districts required under subsection (1) of this section.(((3) By November 1, 2022, and in compliance with RCW 43.01.036, the superintendent of public instruction must report to the house of representatives and senate education committees with the following information from the 2021-22 school year:(a) The number of students: (i) Screened pursuant to RCW 28A.320.260; (ii) with indications of, or areas of weakness associated with, dyslexia identified under RCW 28A.300.700; and (iii) provided interventions pursuant to RCW 28A.320.260;(b) Descriptions from school districts of the types of interventions used in accordance with RCW 28A.320.260 and rates of student progress, when available; and(c) Descriptions from school districts of the issues districts had related to implementing the provisions of RCW 28A.320.260.))Sec. 18. RCW 28A.320.260 and 2018 c 75 s 2 are each amended to read as follows:(1) Beginning in the 2021-22 school year, and as provided in this section, each school district must use a multitiered system((s)) of supports to provide interventions to students in kindergarten through second grade who display indications of, or areas of weakness associated with, dyslexia. In order to provide school districts with the opportunity to intervene before a student's performance falls significantly below grade level, school districts must screen students in kindergarten through second grade for indications of, or areas associated with, dyslexia as provided in this section.(2)(a) School districts must use screening tools and resources that exemplify best practices, as described under RCW 28A.300.700.(b) School districts may use the screening tools and resources identified by the superintendent of public instruction in accordance with RCW 28A.300.700.(3)(a) If a student shows indications of below grade level literacy development or indications of, or areas of weakness associated with, dyslexia, the school district must provide interventions using an evidence-based multitiered system((s)) of supports, consistent with the ((recommendations of the dyslexia advisory council under RCW 28A.300.710))best practices made available by the superintendent of public instruction under RCW 28A.300.720, and as required under this subsection (3).(b) ((The))(i) Through August 31, 2027, the interventions must be evidence-based multisensory structured literacy interventions and must be provided by an educator trained in instructional methods specifically targeting students' areas of weakness.(ii) Beginning September 1, 2027, the interventions must meet the requirements of RCW 28A.320.202 (2) (a) through (e) and (3) (as recodified by this act) and be implemented by teachers or other educators who have completed the educator training program described in RCW 28A.300.530.(c) Whenever possible, a school district must begin by providing student supports in the general education classroom. If screening tools and resources indicate that, after receiving the initial tier of student support, a student requires interventions, the school district may provide the interventions in either the general education classroom or a learning assistance program setting. If after receiving interventions, further screening tools and resources indicate that a student continues to have indications of, or areas of weakness associated with, dyslexia, the school district must recommend to the student's parents and family that the student be evaluated for dyslexia or a specific learning disability.(4) For a student who shows indications of, or areas of weakness associated with, dyslexia, each school district must notify the student's parents and family of the identified indicators and areas of weakness, as well as the plan for using a multitiered system((s)) of supports to provide supports and interventions. The initial notice must also include ((information relating to dyslexia and resources for parental support))the dyslexia handbook developed by the superintendent of public instruction under RCW 28A.300.570. The school district must regularly update the student's parents and family of the student's progress.(5) School districts may use state funds provided under chapter 28A.165 RCW to meet the requirements of this section.Sec. 19. RCW 28A.415.265 and 2019 c 295 s 302 are each amended to read as follows:(1) For the purposes of this section, a mentor educator is a teacher, educational staff associate, or principal who:(a) Has successfully completed training in assisting, coaching, and advising beginning principals, beginning educational staff associates, beginning teachers, or student teachers as defined by the office of the superintendent of public instruction. Beginning September 1, 2027, mentor educators with an assignment related to reading and writing literacy competencies, as determined by the Washington professional educator standards board under section 10 of this act, must have also completed the educator training program described in RCW 28A.300.530;(b) Has been selected using mentor standards developed by the office of the superintendent of public instruction; and(c) Is participating in ongoing mentor skills professional development.(2)(a) The beginning educator support team program is established to provide professional development and mentoring for beginning principals, beginning educational staff associates, beginning teachers, and candidates in alternative route teacher certification programs under chapter 28A.660 RCW.(b) The superintendent of public instruction shall notify school districts about the beginning educator support team program and encourage districts to apply for program funds.(3) Subject to the availability of amounts appropriated for this specific purpose, the office of the superintendent of public instruction shall allocate funds for the beginning educator support team program on a competitive basis to individual school districts, consortia of districts, or state-tribal compact schools. In allocating funds, the office of the superintendent of public instruction shall give priority to:(a) Schools and districts identified for comprehensive or targeted support and improvement as required under the federal elementary and secondary education act;(b) School districts with a large influx of beginning principals, beginning educational staff associates, or beginning classroom teachers; and(c) School districts that demonstrate an understanding of the research-based standards for beginning educator induction developed by the office of the superintendent of public instruction.(4) A portion of the appropriated funds may be used for program coordination and provision of statewide or regional professional development through the office of the superintendent of public instruction.(5) A beginning educator support team program must include the following components:(a) A paid instructional orientation or individualized assistance before the start of the school year for program participants;(b) A trained and qualified mentor assigned to each program participant for up to three years, with intensive support in the first year and decreasing support in subsequent years;(c) A goal to provide program participants from underrepresented populations with a mentor who has strong ties to underrepresented populations;(d) Ongoing professional development designed to meet the unique needs of each program participant for supplemental training and skill development;(e) Initial and ongoing professional development for mentors;(f) Release time for mentors and program participants to work together, as well as time for program participants to observe accomplished peers;(g) To the extent possible, a school or classroom assignment that is appropriate for a beginning principal, beginning educational staff associate, or beginning teacher;(h) Nonevaluative observations with written feedback for program participants;(i) Support in understanding and participating in the state and district evaluation process and using the instructional framework, leadership framework, or both, to promote growth;(j) Adherence to research-based standards for beginning educator induction developed by the office of the superintendent of public instruction; and(k) A program evaluation that identifies program strengths and gaps using the standards for beginning educator induction, the retention of beginning educators, and positive impact on student growth for program participants.(6) The beginning educator support team program components under subsection (5) of this section may be provided for continuous improvement coaching to support educators on probation under RCW 28A.405.100.Sec. 20. RCW 28A.655.230 and 2015 c 125 s 1 are each amended to read as follows:(1) The definitions in this subsection apply throughout this section and RCW 28A.655.235 unless the context clearly requires otherwise.(a) "Basic" means a score on the statewide student assessment at a level two in a four-level scoring system.(b) "Below basic" means a score on the statewide student assessment at a level one in a four-level scoring system.(((c) "Not meet the state standard" means a score on the statewide student assessment at either a level one or a level two in a four-level scoring system.))(2) Prior to the return of the results of the statewide student assessment in English language arts, elementary schools shall require meetings between teachers and parents of students in third grade who are reading below grade-level or who, based on formative or diagnostic assessment, and other indicators, are likely to score in the below basic level on the third grade statewide student assessment in English language arts. At the meeting, the teacher shall inform the parents or guardians of the requirements of this section and the intensive reading improvement strategies that will be available to students before fourth grade. The teacher also shall inform the parents and guardians of the school district's grade placement policy for the following year under subsection (3) of this section. Schools that have regularly scheduled parent teacher conferences may use those meetings to comply with this section.(3)(a) For third grade students to be ((placed in))promoted to fourth grade, ((the strategies provided by the school district must include))they must either: (i) Meet grade level standard on the statewide student assessment in English language arts; (ii) pass an alternative assessment; or (iii) successfully demonstrate sufficient third grade reading skills through a portfolio of student work.(b) For third grade students who do not meet the promotion requirements in (a) of this subsection (3), the school district must implement an intensive reading improvement strategy provided, supported, or contracted by the school district that includes small group reading instruction, a summer program, or other options developed to meet the needs of students repeating third grade to prepare for fourth grade.(4) If a student in third grade scores below grade level on the third grade statewide student assessment in English language arts, and there was no meeting under subsection (2) of this section, the principal or his or her designee shall notify the student's parents or guardians of the following:(a) The below basic score;(b) An explanation of the requirements of this section;(c) The intensive reading improvement strategy options that are available;(d) The school district's grade placement policy under subsection (3) of this section;(e) Contact information for a school district employee who can respond to questions and provide additional information; and(f) A reasonable deadline for obtaining the parent's consent regarding the student's intensive reading improvement strategies that will be implemented ((and the student's grade placement)).(5) The parent's or guardian's consent must be obtained regarding ((the appropriate grade placement and)) the intensive reading improvement strategy to be implemented. The school district must implement the strategy selected in consultation with the student's parents or guardians. If the school district does not receive a response from a parent by the deadline or a reasonable time thereafter, the principal or his or her designee shall make a decision on ((the student's grade placement for the following year and)) the intensive reading improvement strategies that will be implemented during the following school year.(6) If the school principal and parent cannot agree on ((the appropriate grade placement and)) improvement strategies from the list of available options, the parent's request ((will))must be honored.(7) If a student does not have a score in English language arts on the third grade statewide student assessment but the district determines, or is able to anticipate from, using district or classroom-based formative or diagnostic assessments or another standardized assessment, that the student's performance is equivalent to below basic in English language arts, the policy in subsections (2) through (6) of this section applies.(8) Students participating in the transitional bilingual instruction program ((are exempt))may be exempted from the policy in subsections (2) through (6) of this section((, unless the student has participated in the transitional bilingual instruction program for three school years and receives a score of below basic on the third grade statewide student assessment in English language arts))for reasons of good cause that recognize their special needs, particularly if they were previously retained.(9) Students with disabilities whose individualized education program includes specially designed instruction in reading or English language arts ((are exempt from))may be exempted from the policy in subsections (2) through (8) of this section for reasons of good cause that recognize their special needs, particularly if they were previously retained. Communication and consultation with parents or guardians of such students ((shall))must occur through the individualized education program development and revision process required under chapter 28A.155 RCW and associated administrative rules.(10) Intensive reading improvement strategies must be implemented as required by RCW 28A.655.235.Sec. 21. RCW 28A.655.235 and 2013 2nd sp.s. c 18 s 106 are each amended to read as follows:(1)(a) ((Beginning in the 2015-16 school year, except))Except as otherwise provided in this subsection (1), for any student who received a score of basic or below basic on the third grade statewide student assessment in English language arts in the previous school year, the school district must implement an intensive reading ((and literacy)) improvement strategy as follows:(i) Through August 31, 2027, the strategy must be from a state menu of best practices ((established in accordance with subsection (3) of this section or an alternative strategy in accordance with subsection (4) of this section)); and(ii) Beginning September 1, 2027, the strategy must meet the requirements of RCW 28A.320.202 (2) (a) through (e) and (3) (as recodified by this act).(b) ((Reading and literacy))Intensive reading improvement strategies for students with disabilities whose individualized education program includes specially designed instruction in reading or English language arts ((shall))must be as provided in the individualized education program: PROVIDED, That, beginning September 1, 2027, for students who are identified as having a disability related to dyslexia, the specially designed instruction must include instruction that meets the requirements of RCW 28A.320.202 (2) (a) through (e) and (3) (as recodified by this act).(2)(a) ((Also beginning in the 2015-16 school year, in))In any school where more than forty percent of the tested students received a score of basic or below basic on the third grade statewide student assessment in English language arts in the previous school year, as calculated under this subsection (2), the school district must implement an intensive reading ((and literacy)) improvement strategy for all students in grades kindergarten through four at the school as follows:(i) Through August 31, 2027, the strategy must be from a state menu of best practices ((established in accordance with subsection (3) of this section or an alternative strategy in accordance with subsection (4) of this section for all students in grades kindergarten through four at the school)); and(ii) Beginning September 1, 2027, the strategy must meet the requirements of RCW 28A.320.202 (2) (a) through (e) and (3) (as recodified by this act).(b) For the purposes of this subsection (2), the office of the superintendent of public instruction shall exclude the following from the calculation of a school's percentage of tested students receiving a score of basic or below basic on the third grade statewide student assessment:(i) Students enrolled in the transitional bilingual instruction program unless the student has participated in the transitional bilingual instruction program for three school years;(ii) Students with disabilities whose individualized education program specifies a different standard to measure reading performance than is required for the statewide student assessment; and(iii) Schools with fewer than ten students in third grade.(3) ((The office of the superintendent of public instruction shall convene a panel of experts, including the Washington state institute for public policy, to develop a state menu of best practices and strategies for intensive reading and literacy improvement designed to assist struggling students in reaching grade level in reading by the end of fourth grade. The state menu must also include best practices and strategies to improve the reading and literacy of students who are English language learners and for system improvements that schools and school districts can implement to improve reading instruction for all students. The office of the superintendent of public instruction shall publish the state menu by July 1, 2014, and update the state menu by each July 1st thereafter.(4) School districts may use an alternative practice or strategy that is not on a state menu developed under subsection (3) of this section for two school years initially. If the district is able to demonstrate improved outcomes for participating students over the previous two school years at a level commensurate with the best practices and strategies on the state menu, the office of the superintendent of public instruction must approve use of the alternative practice or strategy by the district for one additional school year. Subsequent annual approval by the superintendent of public instruction to use the alternative practice or strategy is dependent on the district continuing to demonstrate an increase in improved outcomes for participating students))Beginning September 1, 2027, teachers and other educators implementing the intensive reading improvement strategies must have completed the educator training program described in RCW 28A.300.530.Sec. 22. RCW 28B.10.033 and 2019 c 295 s 202 are each amended to read as follows:(1)(a) Each Washington professional educator standards board-approved teacher preparation program, including an alternative route teacher certification program, must develop a plan describing how the program will partner with school districts in the general geographic region of the program regarding field placement of student teachers. The plans must be developed in collaboration with school districts desiring to partner with the programs, and may include use of unexpended federal or state funds to support residencies and mentoring for students who are likely to continue teaching in the district in which they have a supervised field placement.(b) Beginning July 1, 2020, the following goals must be considered when developing the plans required under this section:(i) Field placement of student teachers should be targeted to high-need subject areas, including special education and English learner, and high-need geographic areas, including Title I and rural schools; and(ii) Student teacher mentors should be highly effective as evidenced by the mentors having received level 3 or above on both criteria 3 (recognizing individual student learning needs and developing strategies to address those needs) and criteria 6 (using multiple student data elements to modify instruction and improve student learning) on their most recent comprehensive performance evaluation under RCW 28A.405.100. Student teacher mentors should also have received or be concurrently receiving professional development in mentoring skills.(c) Beginning September 1, 2027, student teacher mentors with an assignment related to reading and writing literacy competencies, as determined by the Washington professional educator standards board under section 10 of this act, must have completed the educator training program described in RCW 28A.300.530.(2) The plans required under subsection (1) of this section must be submitted to the Washington professional educator standards board and updated by July 1st every even-numbered year.(3) The Washington professional educator standards board shall post the plans and updates required under this section on its website.NEW SECTION.Â Â Sec. 23. (1) The office of the superintendent of public instruction shall consider how the state learning standards in mathematics compare to the mathematics method developed in the country of Singapore that uses a three-step approach, referred to as concrete-pictorial-abstract in order to help students learn math concepts. By December 31, 2025, and in compliance with RCW 43.01.036, the office of the superintendent of public instruction shall report to the appropriate committees of the legislature with a recommendation of whether the state should update its standards to implement the Singapore mathematics method.(2) This section expires June 30, 2026.NEW SECTION.Â Â Sec. 24. RCW 28A.320.202 is recodified as a section in chapter 28A.230 RCW.NEW SECTION.Â Â Sec. 25. RCW 28B.10.033 is recodified as a section in chapter 28A.410 RCW.NEW SECTION.Â Â Sec. 26. The following acts or parts of acts are each repealed:(1) RCW 28A.300.290 (Effective reading programsâIdentification) and 1996 c 273 s 1;(2) RCW 28A.300.300 (Effective reading programsâInformationâDevelopment and implementation of strategies) and 1998 c 245 s 11 & 1996 c 273 s 4;(3) RCW 28A.300.330 (Primary grade reading grant program) and 1997 c 262 s 4;(4) RCW 28A.300.340 (Primary grade reading grant programâTimelinesâRules) and 1997 c 262 s 7;(5) RCW 28A.410.285 (Teacher preparation programs) and 2019 c 295 s 203;(6) RCW 28A.415.350 (Professional development learning opportunitiesâPartnerships) and 2009 c 539 s 4 & 2007 c 402 s 7;(7) RCW 28A.415.360 (Learning improvement daysâEligibilityâReports) and 2019 c 252 s 117, 2009 c 548 s 403, & 2007 c 402 s 9; and(8) RCW 28A.415.400 (Reading instruction and early literacyâProfessional development) and 2013 2nd sp.s. c 18 s 103.NEW SECTION.Â Â Sec. 27. Section 20 of this act takes effect September 1, 2027.NEW SECTION.Â Â Sec. 28. This act shall be known and cited as the building opportunities for student success (BOSS) act.--- END ---